Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB277.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3051(a)(2) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 3051. Civil causes of action.(a) General rule.--* * *(2) An individual who is a victim of the sex trade may bring a civil action in the court of common pleas of the county where the individual resides or where any of the alleged violations of this chapter occurred against a person that:(i) recruits, profits from or maintains the victim 12345678910111213141516 in any sex trade act;(ii) abuses or causes bodily harm to the victim in any sex trade act; and(iii) knowingly advertises or publishes advertisements for purposes of recruitment into sex trade activity.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0277PN0221 - 2 - 12345678